Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3310
Insurers; contract with others; purposes; approval.

Insurers may contract with other insurers, including insurance companies organized under any of the laws of the State of Nebraska, for partial or total administrative services or for joint participation through contractual agreements or otherwise cede or accept legal expense insurance obligations from such insurers on the whole or any part of such legal expense insurance obligations. Such contract forms, documents, treaties, or agreement forms shall be filed with and approved by the director to be in accordance with the plan of operation of such insurer prior to their effectiveness. The director may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations concerning such participation contracts and agreements with insurers.

Laws 1979, LB 52, § 10;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 231.